Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-404
Controlled substances; declaration.

All drugs and substances or immediate precursors listed in section 28-405 are hereby declared to be controlled substances, whether listed by official name, generic, common, or usual name, chemical name, brand, or trade name.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 64;

Laws 1990, LB 571, § 3;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 31.

Under this section and section 28-405(c)(10) and (c)(15), marijuana is a Schedule I controlled substance, and thus is a "drug." State v. Finnegan, 232 Neb. 75, 439 N.W.2d 496 (1989).